Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 1. Emergency Management
§ 19.
Powers outside of town of appointment.

Whenever the employees of any town or city are rendering outside aid pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter, such employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the town or city in which they are normally employed.

§ 20.
Immunities and defenses.

Except in the case of willful misconduct or gross negligence, the State; any of its agencies; State employees as defined in

3 V.S.A. § 1101

; political subdivisions; local emergency planning committees; or individual, partnership, association, or corporation involved in emergency management activities shall not be liable for the death of or any injury to persons or loss or damage to property resulting from an emergency management service or response activity, including the development of local emergency plans and the response to those plans. Nothing in this section shall exclude the State, its agencies, political subdivisions, or employees from the protections and rights provided in 12 V.S.A. chapter 189.

Any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or facility that provides personnel, training, or equipment through an agreement with the local emergency planning committee, the State Emergency Response Commission, or local emergency response officials is immune from civil liability to the same extent provided in subsection (a) of this section for any act performed within the scope of the agreement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 21.
Compensation for injury or death.

A volunteer, as set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 1101(b)(4)

, shall be entitled to compensation as provided in Titles 21 and 29.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 22.
Repealed. 2005, No. 209 (Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. May. 31, 2006.

§ 23.
General powers not limited by specific powers.

The general powers provided for in this chapter shall not be limited by any specific powers granted to the Governor by any of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 24.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any rule, order, or regulation made pursuant to this chapter, which rule, order, or regulation shall be filed with the Secretary of State, shall, upon conviction thereof, be punishable by a fine not exceeding $500.00 or imprisonment not exceeding six months, or both.

§ 25.
Matching funds.

To the extent of any appropriation available to carry out the purposes of this chapter, federal monies for emergency management within the State may be matched from such an appropriation.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 23

, § 5, eff. March 6, 1959; amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2021, No. 20

, § 121.

§ 26.
Change of venue because of enemy attack.

In the event that the place where a civil action or a criminal prosecution is required by law to be brought has become and remains unsafe because of an attack upon the United States or Canada, such action or prosecution may be brought in or, if already pending, may be transferred to the Superior Court in an unaffected unit and there tried in the place provided by law for such court.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 23

, § 7, eff. March 6, 1959; amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10;

1973, No. 118

, § 23, eff. Oct. 1, 1973;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 156.

§ 27.
Auxiliary State Police.

For the purposes of emergency management, as the term is defined in section 2 of this title, the Commissioner of Public Safety may recruit and train for police duty citizens, including sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables, and police officers, from whom he or she may augment the State Police, in emergency functions, by employing such number of them, for such period and at such compensation as the Governor may fix, as auxiliary State Police, who shall take the oath prescribed for sheriffs and, while so employed, shall each wear a distinctive arm badge marked with the words “AUXILIARY STATE POLICE” and shall have the powers and immunities of the State Police as defined in section 1914 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 23

, § 8, eff. March 6, 1959; amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.

§ 28.
Emergency management medical program.

The Department of Health is hereby directed, within the limits of appropriations and grants made to it, and in coordination with local, State, and federal emergency management officials, to plan, develop, and implement a comprehensive emergency management medical program to protect and assist the people of the State in an all-hazards event.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 151

; amended

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 29.
Emergency shelters; no private liability.

Any person owning or controlling premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part of such land and premises for the purpose of sheltering persons or animals or providing health-related services during a declared emergency or practice drill in cooperation with a federal, State, or political subdivision, shall, together with successors in interest, not be civilly liable for negligence causing the death of or injury to any person on or about the land and premises or for loss of or damage to the property of the person during a declared emergency or practice drill.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 67

, eff. May 2, 1963; amended

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.

§ 30.
State Emergency Response Commission; creation.

The State Emergency Response Commission is created within the Department of Public Safety. The Commission shall consist of 17 members: eight ex officio members, including the Commissioner of Public Safety, the Secretary of Natural Resources, the Secretary of Transportation, the Commissioner of Health, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Commissioner of Labor, the Director of Fire Safety, and the Director of Emergency Management, or designees; and nine public members, including a representative from each of the following: local government, the local emergency planning committee, a regional planning commission, the fire service, law enforcement, emergency medical service, a hospital, a transportation entity required under EPCRA to report chemicals to the State Emergency Response Commission, and another entity required to report extremely hazardous substances under EPCRA.

The nine public members shall be appointed by the Governor for staggered three-year terms. The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Commission.

Members of the Commission, except State employees who are not otherwise compensated as part of their employment and who attend meetings, shall be entitled to a per diem and expenses as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 23; amended

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 14, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2007, No. 47

, § 16;

2021, No. 52

, § 13.

§ 31.
State Emergency Response Commission; duties.

The Commission shall have authority to:

Carry out all the requirements of a commission under the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11001-11050 (1986) (EPCRA).

Adopt rules necessary for the implementation of EPCRA and for the reporting of hazardous chemicals or substances, including setting minimum limits on the level of hazardous chemicals to be reported.

Designate and appoint local emergency planning committees.

Review and comment on the development and implementation of local emergency plans by the local emergency planning committee and provide assistance to that committee in executing its duties.

Review and comment on the comprehensive State Emergency Management Plan and the local emergency planning committee plans.

Meet with interested parties, which may include representatives of the carrier industry shippers, and State and local agencies having an interest, responsibility, or expertise concerning hazardous materials.

Ensure that a State plan will go into effect when an accident occurs involving the transportation of hazardous materials. The plan shall be exercised at least once annually and shall be coordinated with local and State emergency plans.

Jointly adopt rules concerning reportable quantities of economic poison as defined in

6 V.S.A. § 911(5)

with the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Commission may enter into contracts with governmental agencies or private organizations to carry out the duties of this section.

Recommend funding for awards to be made by the Commissioner for planning, training, exercises, and response capabilities from funds that are available from federal sources or through the Hazardous Substances Fund created in section 38 of this title. The Commission may create committees as necessary for other related purposes and delegate funding recommendation powers to those committees.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide administrative support to the State Emergency Response Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 24; amended

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 14, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2021, No. 52

, § 14.

§ 32.
Local emergency planning committees; creation; duties.

One or more local emergency planning committees shall be appointed by the State Emergency Response Commission.

All local emergency planning committees shall include representatives from the following: fire departments; local and regional emergency medical services; local, county, and State law enforcement; media; transportation; regional planning commissions; hospitals; industry; the Vermont National Guard; the Department of Health’s district office; and an animal rescue organization, and may include any other interested public or private individual or organization. Where the local emergency planning committee represents more than one region of the State, the Commission shall appoint representatives that are geographically diverse.

A local emergency planning committee shall perform all the following duties:

Carry out all the requirements of a committee pursuant to EPCRA, including preparing a local emergency planning committee plan. The plan shall be coordinated with the State emergency management plan and may be expanded to address all-hazards identified in the State emergency management plan. At a minimum, the local emergency planning committee plan shall include the following:

Identifies facilities and transportation routes of extremely hazardous substances.

Describes emergency response procedures, including those identified in facility plans.

Designates a local emergency planning committee coordinator and facility coordinators to implement the plan.

Outlines emergency notification procedures.

Describes how to determine the probable affected area and population by releases of hazardous substances.

Describes local emergency equipment and facilities and the persons responsible for them.

Outlines evacuation plans.

Provides for coordinated local training to ensure integration with the State emergency management plan.

Provides methods and schedules for exercising emergency plans.

Upon receipt by the committee or the committee’s designated community emergency coordinator of a notification of a release of a hazardous chemical or substance, ensure that the local emergency plan has been implemented.

Consult and coordinate with the heads of local government emergency services, the emergency management director or designee, regional planning commissions, and the managers of all facilities within the jurisdiction regarding the facility plan.

Review and evaluate requests for funding and other resources and advise the State Emergency Response Commission concerning disbursement of funds.

Work to support the various emergency services, mutual aid systems, town governments, regional planning commissions, State agency district offices, and others in their area in conducting coordinated all-hazards emergency management activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 25; amended

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2021, No. 20

, § 122;

2021, No. 52

, § 15.

§ 33.
Hazmat teams; team chiefs; creation.

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to create a State hazardous materials (HAZMAT) response team. The Commissioner shall appoint a HAZMAT team chief, consistent with rules adopted by the Department of Human Resources, to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the HAZMAT response team.

The HAZMAT team chief shall perform all the following duties:

organize a State HAZMAT response team to assist local emergency planning committees, fire chiefs, and other emergency management officials in response to hazardous chemical and substance (HAZMAT) incidents;

hire persons for the HAZMAT team from fire, police, and emergency organizations and persons with specialty backgrounds in hazardous materials, and, with the approval of the Director of the Division of Fire Safety, appoint crew chiefs;

negotiate with municipalities that maintain firefighting departments to secure appropriate facilities and personnel to house and maintain the response team’s vehicles and equipment and to provide drivers for the response vehicles;

coordinate the acquisition and maintenance of adequate vehicles and equipment for the response teams;

ensure that response team personnel are organized, trained, and exercised in accordance with the standards set by the Fire Service Training Council and the State Emergency Response Commission;

ensure that appropriate regional mutual aid agreements are created so that all firefighting departments within the region may participate with the regional HAZMAT response team.

The State shall reimburse a municipality for the actual costs expended to cover the duties of a municipality’s employee who is an employee of the State HAZMAT team and who is requested to leave his or her employment at the municipality to respond to a HAZMAT incident or attend HAZMAT team training.

The Department of Public Safety may employ as many State HAZMAT team responders as the Commissioner deems necessary as temporary State employees, who shall be compensated as such when authorized to respond to a HAZMAT incident or to attend HAZMAT training. State HAZMAT team responders, whenever acting as State agents in accordance with this section, shall be afforded all of the protections and immunities of State employees.

The team chief and the crew chiefs, referred to in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, shall have the authority to accept the transfer of control of a hazardous material incident from the chief engineer or senior fire officer at a scene.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 14, 1994; amended

1995, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2-4, eff. April 23, 1996;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. May 24, 2000;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 34.
Temporary housing for disaster victims.

Whenever the Governor has proclaimed a disaster emergency under the laws of this State, or the President has declared an emergency or a major disaster to exist in this State, the Governor is authorized:

To enter into purchase, lease, or other arrangements with any agency of the United States for temporary housing units to be occupied by disaster victims and to make such units available to any political subdivision of the State.

To assist any political subdivision of this State that is the locus of temporary housing for disaster victims to acquire sites necessary for the temporary housing and to do all things required to prepare the site to receive and utilize temporary housing units by:

advancing or lending funds available to the Governor from any appropriation made by the General Assembly or from any other source,

“passing through” funds made available by any agency, public or private, or

becoming a co-partner with the political subdivision for the execution and performance of any temporary housing for disaster victims project and for such purposes to pledge the credit of the State on such terms as the Governor deems appropriate having due regard for current debt transactions of the State.

Under rules adopted by the Governor, to temporarily suspend or modify for not more than 60 days any public health, safety, zoning, transportation (within or across the State), or other requirement of law or rules within Vermont when by proclamation the Governor deems the suspension or modification essential to provide temporary housing for disaster victims.

Any political subdivision of this State is expressly authorized to acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for installation of temporary housing units for disaster victims, and to enter into whatever arrangements are necessary to prepare or equip such sites to utilize the housing units, including the purchase of temporary housing units and payment of transportation charges.

The Governor is authorized to adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the Governor’s authority to apply for, administer, and expend any grants, gifts, or payments in aid of disaster prevention, preparedness, response, or recovery.

As used in this chapter, “major disaster,” “emergency,” and “temporary housing” have the same meaning as in the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, P.L. 93-288.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 97

, § 1, eff. April 30, 1975; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 123.

§ 35.
Community disaster loans.

Whenever, at the request of the Governor, the President has declared a “major disaster” to exist in this State, the Governor is authorized:

upon his or her determination that a local government of the State will suffer a substantial loss of tax and other revenues from a major disaster and has demonstrated a need for financial assistance to perform its governmental functions, to apply to the federal government, on behalf of the local government, for a loan and to receive and disburse the proceeds of any approved loan to any applicant local government;

to determine the amount needed by any applicant local government to restore or resume its governmental functions and to certify the same to the federal government; provided, however, that no application amount shall exceed 25 percent of the annual operating budget of the applicant for the fiscal year in which the major disaster occurs;

to recommend to the federal government, based upon his or her review, the cancellation of all or any part of repayment when, in the first three full fiscal year period following the major disaster, the revenues of the local government are insufficient to meet its operating expenses, including additional disaster-related expenses of a municipal operation character.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 97

, § 2, eff. April 30, 1975.

§ 36.
Debris and wreckage removal.

Whenever the Governor has declared a disaster emergency to exist under the laws of this State, or the President, at the request of the Governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this State, the Governor is authorized:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, through the use of State departments or agencies, or the use of any of the State’s instrumentalities, to clear or remove from publicly or privately owned land or water, debris and wreckage that may threaten public health or safety, or public or private property, in any disaster emergency declared by the Governor or major disaster declared by the President.

To accept funds from the federal government and utilize the funds to make grants to any local government for the purpose of removing debris or wreckage from publicly or privately owned land or water.

Authority under this chapter shall not be exercised unless the affected local government, corporation, organization, or individual shall first present an unconditional authorization for removal of the debris or wreckage from public and private property and, in the case of removal of debris or wreckage from private property, shall first agree to indemnify the State government against any claim arising from such removal.

Whenever the Governor provides for clearance of debris or wreckage pursuant to subsections (a) or (b) of this section, employees of the designated State agencies or individuals appointed by the State are authorized to enter upon private land or waters and perform any tasks necessary to the removal or clearance operation.

Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any State employee or agent complying with orders of the Governor and performing duties pursuant to the Governor’s orders under this chapter shall not be liable for death of or injury to persons or damage to property.

The Governor is authorized to adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 97

, § 3, eff. April 30, 1975; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 124.

§ 37.
State financial participation in grants to disaster victims.

Whenever the President, at the request of the Governor, has declared a major disaster to exist in this State, the Governor is authorized:

Upon his or her determination that financial assistance is essential to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a major disaster that cannot be otherwise adequately met from other means of assistance, to accept a grant by the federal government to fund such financial assistance, subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed upon the grant.

To enter into an agreement with the federal government, or any officer or agency of the federal government, under which the State is to participate in the funding of the financial assistance authorized in subdivision (1) of this subsection, in an amount not to exceed 25 percent of the amount of financial assistance and, if State funds are not otherwise available to the Governor, to accept an advance of the State share from the federal government to be repaid when the State is able to do so.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the Governor is authorized to make financial grants to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a major disaster that cannot otherwise adequately be met from other means of assistance, which shall not exceed $5,000.00 in the aggregate to an individual or family in any single major disaster declared by the President.

The Governor shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including standards of eligibility for persons applying for benefits; procedures for applying and administration; methods of investigation, filing, and approving applications; and formation of local or statewide boards to pass upon applications and procedures for appeals.

Any person who fraudulently or willfully makes a misstatement of fact in connection with an application for financial assistance under this title shall, upon conviction of each offense, be subject to a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 97

, § 4, eff. April 30, 1975; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 125.

§ 38.
Special funds.

There is created a Hazardous Chemical and Substance Emergency Response Fund that shall include all monies paid to the State pursuant to section 39 of this title. The Fund shall be managed pursuant to the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The Fund shall be used to implement and administer this chapter, including planning, training, and response activities as well as the purchase of equipment and assisting local organizations referred to in section 6 of this chapter to develop emergency plans. Each local emergency planning committee shall receive an annual grant from the Commissioner of Public Safety. The annual total grant amount to be allocated to local emergency planning committees statewide shall not exceed $52,000.00, and the Commissioner shall divide the total annual grant amount equally among the local emergency planning committees. After disbursement of the funding and after consideration of the comments and evaluation received from the local emergency planning committee and the State Emergency Response Commission, the Commissioner of Public Safety at the Commissioner’s discretion may make additional grants from the Fund to any local emergency planning committee or regional emergency response commission as well as to any political subdivisions including any city, town, fire district, incorporated village and other incorporated entities in the State in accordance with rules adopted by the State Emergency Response Commission. Unless waived by the State Emergency Response Commission, grants shall be matched by local governments in the amount of 25 percent of the grant. The matching may be by contribution or by privately furnished funds or by in-kind services, space, or equipment that would otherwise be purchased by a local emergency planning committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 26; amended

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 14, 1994;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 425, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 59

, § 5, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 206;

2001, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 114;

2003, No. 66

, §§ 97a, 97b;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 68b;

2007, No. 65

, § 71a;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.904;

2009, No. 33

, § 41;

2021, No. 20

, § 126;

2021, No. 52

, § 16.

§ 39.
Fees to the Hazardous Substances Fund.

Every person required to report the use or storage of hazardous chemicals or substances pursuant to EPCRA shall pay the following annual fees for each hazardous chemical or substance, as defined by the State Emergency Response Commission, that is present at the facility:

$40.00 for quantities between 100 and 999 pounds.

$60.00 for quantities between 1,000 and 9,999 pounds.

$100.00 for quantities between 10,000 and 99,999 pounds.

$290.00 for quantities between 100,000 and 999,999 pounds.

$880.00 for quantities exceeding 999,999 pounds.

An additional fee of $250.00 will be assessed for each extremely hazardous chemical or substance as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11002.

The fee shall be paid to the Commissioner of Public Safety and shall be deposited into the Hazardous Chemical and Substance Emergency Response Fund.

The following are exempted from paying the fees required by this section but shall comply with the reporting requirements of this chapter:

municipalities and other political subdivisions;

State agencies;

persons engaged in farming as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6001

;

nonprofit corporations.

No person shall be required to pay a fee for a chemical or substance that has been determined to be an economic poison as defined in

6 V.S.A. § 911

or for a fertilizer or agricultural lime as defined in

6 V.S.A. § 363

and for which a registration or tonnage fee has been paid to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets pursuant to 6 V.S.A. chapter 28 or 81.

The State or any political subdivision, including any municipality, fire district, emergency medical service, or incorporated village, is authorized to recover any and all reasonable direct expenses incurred as a result of the response to and recovery of a hazardous chemical or substance incident from the person or persons responsible for the incident. All funds collected by the State under this subsection shall be deposited into the Hazardous Chemical and Substance Emergency Response Fund created pursuant to subsection 38(b) of this chapter. The Attorney General shall act on behalf of the State to recover these expenses. The State or political subdivision shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees that are incurred as a result of exercising the provisions of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 27; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1990;

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 8, eff. June 14, 1994;

1999, No. 49

, § 158;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2005, No. 72

, § 14;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 36.

§ 40.
Enforcement.

The Department of Public Safety shall have authority to inspect the premises and records of any employer to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

A person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. Each day a violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate violation.

The Attorney General may bring an action for injunctive relief in the Superior Court of the county in which a violation occurs to compel compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 14, 1994.

§ 41.
[Reserved for future use.]

§§ 42-44.
Repealed.
1989, No. 252 (Adj. Sess.), § 28(b).

§ 45.
Emergency relief and assistance.

If a state of emergency due to an all-hazards event is declared by the Governor, the Secretary of Administration may expend from the Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund such funds necessary to meet match requirements for federal grants.

The Emergency Board established by

32 V.S.A. § 131

may authorize the Secretary of Administration to expend from the Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 to avert an emergency natural or otherwise as identified by the Board and to expend from the Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund to award low-interest loans and grants to municipalities that sustain damage to public infrastructure as a result of a natural disaster and to persons whose homes, farms, or businesses are damaged by a natural disaster. Assistance under this subsection may supplement assistance provided through federal and local emergency assistance programs, but eligibility for federal or local assistance shall not be required for eligibility under this subsection.

There is created an Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund to be administered by the Secretary of Administration as a special fund under the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The Fund shall contain any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General Assembly.

Funds utilized under this section shall be distributed in accordance with criteria and procedures established by rule by the Secretary of Administration.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 62

, § 272a; amended

1999, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 278, eff. May 29, 2000;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 282;

2009, No. 33

, § 83(i)(1).

§ 46.
Disaster Relief Workers Fund; health care providers; reimbursement.

The Disaster Relief Workers Fund is established in the State Treasury, and shall be managed in accordance with the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The Fund is established for the purpose of providing pay reimbursement to employers of certain public or private health care providers who perform mental health disaster relief services.

All monies received by or generated to the Fund shall be used to provide wage reimbursement to any public or private Vermont employer for disaster relief services rendered by its employee. The employee shall be a certified disaster relief service volunteer of the American Red Cross. Reimbursement shall be for not more than 14 days for performing disaster relief work pursuant to a request from the American Red Cross when:

the work is performed in Vermont;

the disaster is a federal or presidentially declared disaster designated as Level III or above, according to the American Red Cross rules and procedures; or

the disaster is declared by the governor of a state or territory.

The proceeds from grants, donations, contributions, and other sources of revenue, as provided by law, may be deposited in the Fund. Interest earned on the Fund and any balance remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the Fund. The Treasurer’s Office shall maintain records that indicate the amount of money in the Fund at any given time.

The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants for disbursement from the Fund only for the purposes described in subsection (b) of this section, and shall administer the Fund pursuant to an appropriation from the Fund by the General Assembly or authorization from the Emergency Board.

For mental health care relief services, the Commissioner of Mental Health or a director of a regional mental health center may make timely applications to any and all appropriate federal or other grant programs that provide money for disaster relief or homeland security services, including the Crisis Counseling Training and Assistance Program. Any monies awarded from these sources for the purposes authorized in subsection (b) of this section shall be deposited into the Disaster Relief Workers Fund. The Commissioner of Mental Health shall supervise the administration of mental health care reimbursements under this section.

Nothing in this section shall render an employer liable for damage, injury, or harm caused or sustained by an employee who performs disaster relief services and who is eligible for reimbursement under this section, whether or not reimbursement occurs.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 120;

2021, No. 20

, § 127.